Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1950
Violations; penalty.

Any person who
establishes, operates, or maintains a residential child-caring agency or child-placing
agency subject to the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing Licensure
Act without first obtaining a license as required under the act or who violates
any of the provisions of the act shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
Each day such person operates after a first conviction shall be considered
a subsequent offense.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 27.
May 26, 2013